Wisconsin, session 2025, SB866.
do enact as follows:SB866,13Section 1. 301.45 (1d) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB866,2,44301.45 (1d) (b) “Sex offense” means a violation, or the solicitation, conspiracy, 5or attempt to commit a violation, of s. 940.22 (2), 940.225 (1), (2) or (3), 944.06, 6944.18, 944.34, 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.05, 948.051, 948.055, 948.06, 948.07 1(1) to (4), 948.075, 948.08, 948.085, 948.095, 948.11 (2) (a) or (am), 948.12, 948.125, 2948.13, or 948.30, of s. 940.302 (2) if s. 940.302 (2) (a) 1. b. applies, or of s. 940.30 or 3940.31 if the victim was a minor and the person who committed the violation was 4not the victim’s parent.SB866,25Section 2. Initial applicability.SB866,2,76(1) This act first applies to a violation committed on the effective date of this 7subsection.SB866,2,88